Florida, session 2026, SB1328.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 322.142, Florida 19 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (5) and (6) are added to 20 that section, to read: 21 322.142âColor photographic or digital imaged licenses.â 22 (4)âThe department may maintain a film negative or print 23 file. The department shall maintain a record of the digital 24 image and signature of the licensees, together with other data 25 required by the department for identification and retrieval. 26 Reproductions from the file or digital record are exempt from 27 the provisions of s. 119.07(1) and may be made and issued only: 28 (a)âFor departmental administrative purposes; 29 (b)âFor the issuance of duplicate licenses; 30 (c)âFor the purpose of fraud prevention, identity 31 verification, and ensuring the integrity or security of 32 individual identities within this state, with the licenseeâs 33 consent, to any of the following: 34 1.âA state agency pursuant to an interagency agreement with 35 the department. 36 2.âA third party that has entered into a contract with the 37 department to perform identity verification services for persons 38 or entities, which services are regulated by a state agency 39 pursuant to standards established by the department; 40 (d)âIn response to law enforcement agency requests; 41 (e)(d)âTo the Department of Business and Professional 42 Regulation and the Department of Health pursuant to an 43 interagency agreement for the purpose of accessing digital 44 images for reproduction of licenses issued by the Department of 45 Business and Professional Regulation or the Department of 46 Health; 47 (f)(e)âTo the Department of State or a supervisor of 48 elections pursuant to an interagency agreement to facilitate 49 determinations of eligibility of voter registration applicants 50 and registered voters in accordance with ss. 98.045 and 98.075; 51 (g)(f)âTo the Department of Revenue pursuant to an 52 interagency agreement for use in establishing paternity and 53 establishing, modifying, or enforcing support obligations in 54 Title IV-D cases; 55 (h)(g)âTo the Department of Children and Families pursuant 56 to an interagency agreement to conduct protective investigations 57 under part III of chapter 39 and chapter 415; 58 (i)(h)âTo the Department of Children and Families pursuant 59 to an interagency agreement specifying the number of employees 60 in each of that departmentâs regions to be granted access to the 61 records for use as verification of identity to expedite the 62 determination of eligibility for public assistance and for use 63 in public assistance fraud investigations; 64 (j)(i)âTo the Agency for Health Care Administration 65 pursuant to an interagency agreement for the purpose of 66 authorized agencies verifying photographs in the Care Provider 67 Background Screening Clearinghouse authorized under s. 435.12; 68 (k)(j)âTo the Department of Financial Services pursuant to 69 an interagency agreement to facilitate the location of owners of 70 unclaimed property, the validation of unclaimed property claims, 71 the identification of fraudulent or false claims, and the 72 investigation of allegations of violations of the insurance code 73 by licensees and unlicensed persons; 74 (l)(k)âTo the Department of Commerce pursuant to an 75 interagency agreement to facilitate the validation of 76 reemployment assistance claims and the identification of 77 fraudulent or false reemployment assistance claims; 78 (m)(l)âTo district medical examiners pursuant to an 79 interagency agreement for the purpose of identifying a deceased 80 individual, determining cause of death, and notifying next of 81 kin of any investigations, including autopsies and other 82 laboratory examinations, authorized in s. 406.11; 83 (n)(m)âTo the following persons for the purpose of 84 identifying a person as part of the official work of a court: 85 1.âA justice or judge of this state; 86 2.âAn employee of the state courts system who works in a 87 position that is designated in writing for access by the Chief 88 Justice of the Supreme Court or a chief judge of a district or 89 circuit court, or by his or her designee; or 90 3.âA government employee who performs functions on behalf 91 of the state courts system in a position that is designated in 92 writing for access by the Chief Justice or a chief judge, or by 93 his or her designee; or 94 (o)(n)âTo the Agency for Health Care Administration 95 pursuant to an interagency agreement to prevent health care 96 fraud. If the Agency for Health Care Administration enters into 97 an agreement with a private entity to carry out duties relating 98 to health care fraud prevention, such contracts must shall 99 include, but need not be limited to: 100 1.âProvisions requiring internal controls and audit 101 processes to identify access, use, and unauthorized access of 102 information. 103 2.âA requirement to report unauthorized access or use to 104 the Agency for Health Care Administration within 1 business day 105 after the discovery of the unauthorized access or use. 106 3.âProvisions for liquidated damages for unauthorized 107 access or use of no less than $5,000 per occurrence. 108 (5)âA third party performing identity verification services 109 in accordance with subparagraph (4)(c)2. may use licensee 110 images, signatures, and data in a manner consistent with this 111 section if the data remains in the departmentâs possession. The 112 third party may not retain or sell a licenseeâs image, 113 signature, or data without the consent of the licensee and may 114 not retain Internet protocol addresses, geolocation data, or 115 other information that describes the location, computer, 116 computer system, or computer network from which a person or 117 entity accesses identity verification services. 118 (6)âAny revenues generated as a result of an interagency 119 agreement entered into under subparagraph(4)(c)1. or funds due 120 to the department under a contract entered into under 121 subparagraph (4)(c)2. shall be deposited in the Highway Safety 122 Operating Trust Fund. 123 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.